src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON H/aus__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Ha/ß__n_m
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Herz/og__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON H/olz__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Hörs/aal__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQe/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Hospit/al__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON H/ub__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON H/uhn__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: Qer-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Indiz__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;

LEXICON Innenr/and__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON Innere__n_nt 
+N+Neu: SG-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOM ;

LEXICON Irrt/um__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON K/alb__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON K/amp__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Kapital__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kapl/an__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Karussell__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON K/asten__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Klee__n_m 
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kleinod__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Kl/oster__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kl/otz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Knick__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;

LEXICON Kn/opf__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON K/och__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Komma__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCta/DATta/GENta/NOMta ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON K/orb__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kr/aft__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kr/agen__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kr/an__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kr/anz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Kr/aut__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON K/uh__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON L/amm__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Leis__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATe/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON L/och__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON L/ohn__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/acht__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
+N: Qe-PL-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Machtw/ort__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;

LEXICON Mädel__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCs/DATs/GENs/NOMs ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/agd__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Magnet__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCen/ACC/DATen/DAT/GENen/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/angel__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Fem+Use/NG: PL-DATQn ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/antel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/arkt__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/arsch__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Mast__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/atz__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/DATQe/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;

LEXICON M/aul__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Mineral__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCien/DATien/GENien/NOMien ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Missst/and__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Mohr__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCen/DATen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACCen/ACC/DATen/DAT/GENen/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON Mosaik__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCe/DATen/GENe/NOMe ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCen/GENen/NOMen ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON M/und__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Muni__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;

LEXICON N/agel__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQn/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON N/aht__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON N/ot__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON N/uss__n_f 
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON N/uß__n_f
!-- ß = ss --><!-- ß = ss -->
+N+Fem: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Fem: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON /Ofen__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQ/DATQ/GENQ/NOMQ ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON P/apst__n_m 
+N+Msc: PL-ACCQe/DATQen/GENQe/NOMQe ;
+N+Msc: SG-ACC/DAT/GENes/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Msc+Use/NG: SG-DATe ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Partikel__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACC/DAT/GEN/NOM ;
+N+Neu: PL-ACCn/DATn/GENn/NOMn ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GEN/GENs/NOM ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;

LEXICON Passw/ort__n_nt 
+N+Neu: PL-ACCQer/DATQern/GENQer/NOMQer ;
+N+Neu: SG-ACC/DAT/GENs/NOM ;
+N+Neu+Use/NG: SG-DATe/GENes ;
+N: SG-CMP-L ;
