src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns 
Magd:Magd M/agd__n_f ;
Anklagebank:Anklagebank K/uh__n_f  ;
Geschworenenbank:Geschworenenbank K/uh__n_f  ;
Sitzbank:Sitzbank K/uh__n_f  ;
Mangel:Mangel M/angel__n_f ;
Haselnuss:Haselnuss N/uss__n_f ;
Kokosnuss:Kokosnuss N/uss__n_f ;
Atomkraft:Atomkraft Kr/aft__n_f ;
Hilfskraft:Hilfskraft Kr/aft__n_f ;
Arbeitskraft:Arbeitskraft Kr/aft__n_f ;
Naht:Naht N/aht__n_f ;
Nacht:Nacht M/acht__n_f ;
Seemacht:Seemacht M/acht__n_f ;
Not:Not N/ot__n_f ;
Hungersnot:Hungersnot N/ot__n_f ;
Nuß:Nuß N/uß__n_f ;
Strandkorb:Strandkorb K/orb__n_m ;
Geschirrkorb:Geschirrkorb K/orb__n_m ;
Brustkorb:Brustkorb K/orb__n_m ;
Hub:Hub H/ub__n_m ;
Schub:Schub H/ub__n_m ;
Nachschub:Nachschub H/ub__n_m ;
Wegrand:Wegrand Innenr/and__n_m ;
Innenrand:Innenrand Innenr/and__n_m ;
Stadtrand:Stadtrand Innenr/and__n_m ;
Zwischenstand:Zwischenstand Missst/and__n_m ;
Missstand:Missstand Missst/and__n_m ;
Mund:Mund M/und__n_m ;
Schnee:Schnee Klee__n_m ;
Striptease:Striptease Klee__n_m ;
Schmelzkäse:Schmelzkäse Klee__n_m ;
Schweinekopf:Schweinekopf Kn/opf__n_m ;
Kehlkopf:Kehlkopf Kn/opf__n_m ;
Manschettenknopf:Manschettenknopf Kn/opf__n_m ;
Herzog:Herzog Herz/og__n_m ;
Erzherzog:Erzherzog Herz/og__n_m ;
Koch:Koch K/och__n_m ;
Chefkoch:Chefkoch K/och__n_m ;
Aufmarsch:Aufmarsch M/arsch__n_m ;
Einmarsch:Einmarsch M/arsch__n_m ;
Heuhaufen:Heuhaufen Muni__n_m ;
Donnerstagmorgen:Donnerstagmorgen Muni__n_m ;
Speisesaal:Speisesaal Hörs/aal__n_m ;
Ballsaal:Ballsaal Hörs/aal__n_m ;
Gerichtssaal:Gerichtssaal Hörs/aal__n_m ;
Nagel:Nagel N/agel__n_m ;
Fingernagel:Fingernagel N/agel__n_m ;
Bademantel:Bademantel M/antel__n_m ;
Morgenmantel:Morgenmantel M/antel__n_m ;
Reichtum:Reichtum Irrt/um__n_m ;
Irrtum:Irrtum Irrt/um__n_m ;
Kaplan:Kaplan Kapl/an__n_m ;
Kran:Kran Kr/an__n_m ;
Hochofen:Hochofen /Ofen__n_m ;
Backofen:Backofen /Ofen__n_m ;
Speisewagen:Speisewagen Kr/agen__n_m ;
Gepäckwagen:Gepäckwagen Kr/agen__n_m ;
Panzerwagen:Panzerwagen Kr/agen__n_m ;
Sandkasten:Sandkasten K/asten__n_m ;
Werkzeugkasten:Werkzeugkasten K/asten__n_m ;
Sicherungskasten:Sicherungskasten K/asten__n_m ;
Sohn:Sohn L/ohn__n_m ;
Wochenlohn:Wochenlohn L/ohn__n_m ;
Enkelsohn:Enkelsohn L/ohn__n_m ;
Kamp:Kamp K/amp__n_m ;
Mohr:Mohr Mohr__n_m ;
Oberst:Oberst Mohr__n_m ;
Leis:Leis Leis__n_m ;
Magnet:Magnet Magnet__n_m ;
Verbrauchermarkt:Verbrauchermarkt M/arkt__n_m ;
Jahrmarkt:Jahrmarkt M/arkt__n_m ;
Sendemast:Sendemast Mast__n_m ;
Fahnenmast:Fahnenmast Mast__n_m ;
Papst:Papst P/apst__n_m ;
Bauchtanz:Bauchtanz Kr/anz__n_m ;
Schwanz:Schwanz Kr/anz__n_m ;
Leierschwanz:Leierschwanz Kr/anz__n_m ;
Matz:Matz M/atz__n_m ;
Klotz:Klotz Kl/otz__n_m ;
Wohnklotz:Wohnklotz Kl/otz__n_m ;
Haß:Haß Ha/ß__n_m ;
Komma:Komma Komma__n_nt ;
Kalb:Kalb K/alb__n_nt ;
Kleinod:Kleinod Kleinod__n_nt ;
Innere:Innere Innere__n_nt ;
Landesinnere:Landesinnere Innere__n_nt ;
Allerneuste:Allerneuste Innere__n_nt ;
Knopfloch:Knopfloch L/och__n_nt ;
Schlupfloch:Schlupfloch L/och__n_nt ;
Schlüsselloch:Schlüsselloch L/och__n_nt ;
Knick:Knick Knick__n_nt ;
Mosaik:Mosaik Mosaik__n_nt ;
Hospital:Hospital Hospit/al__n_nt ;
Mineral:Mineral Mineral__n_nt ;
Prinzip:Prinzip Mineral__n_nt ;
Kapital:Kapital Kapital__n_nt ;
Release:Release Mädel__n_nt ;
Mädel:Mädel Mädel__n_nt ;
Partikel:Partikel Partikel__n_nt ;
Karussell:Karussell Karussell__n_nt ;
Malheur:Malheur Karussell__n_nt ;
Mammut:Mammut Karussell__n_nt ;
Maul:Maul M/aul__n_nt ;
Lamm:Lamm L/amm__n_nt ;
Opferlamm:Opferlamm L/amm__n_nt ;
Rebhuhn:Rebhuhn H/uhn__n_nt ;
Freilandhuhn:Freilandhuhn H/uhn__n_nt ;
Perlhuhn:Perlhuhn H/uhn__n_nt ;
Kloster:Kloster Kl/oster__n_nt ;
Blockhaus:Blockhaus H/aus__n_nt ;
Zweifamilienhaus:Zweifamilienhaus H/aus__n_nt ;
Fahrerhaus:Fahrerhaus H/aus__n_nt ;
Sprichwort:Sprichwort Passw/ort__n_nt ;
Passwort:Passwort Passw/ort__n_nt ;
Zahlwort:Zahlwort Machtw/ort__n_nt ;
Beziehungswort:Beziehungswort Machtw/ort__n_nt ;
Kraut:Kraut Kr/aut__n_nt ;
Unkraut:Unkraut Kr/aut__n_nt ;
Indiz:Indiz Indiz__n_nt ;
Streichholz:Streichholz H/olz__n_nt ;
Sandelholz:Sandelholz H/olz__n_nt ;
Hartholz:Hartholz H/olz__n_nt ;
